Utah statutes.
67-21-5.   Court orders for violation of chapter.

(1)  A court, in rendering a judgment in an action brought under this chapter, may order reinstatement of the employee at the same level, the payment of back wages, full reinstatement of fringe benefits and seniority rights, actual damages, or any combination of these remedies.

(2)  A court shall also award the complainant all or a portion of the costs of litigation, which are defined to include reasonable attorney fees and witness fees, if the court determines that the award is appropriate.



Amended by Chapter 177, 1999 General Session

